Georgia, session 2025_26, HB495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended by
repealing Chapter 18, relating to the Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation, in its
entirety.
H. B. 495
- 1 -

LC 44 3049
SECTION 2.
Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to agriculture, is amended by
adding a new chapter to read as follows:
"CHAPTER 24
2-24-1.
(a) Effective July 1, 2025, the Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation shall be
transferred from the University System of Georgia to the department and shall be
physically located within a department facility.
(b)(1) The director of the Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation shall be appointed
by the Commissioner, provided that such appointment shall be subject to approval by a
majority vote of the Georgia Rural Development Council. The director shall continue to
serve in such position until his or her resignation or until the appointment of a new
director by the Commissioner, provided that such appointment is approved by a majority
vote of such council.
(2) Subject to appropriations, the director shall be authorized to employ such personnel
as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
2-24-2.
(a) The Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation shall assume the business and
responsibilities of the Centers of Innovation Agribusiness administered by the Department
of Economic Development.
(b) The Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation, the Department of Economic
Development, and the department shall collaborate as necessary to achieve the mission
provided by Code Section 2-24-4.
H. B. 495
- 2 -

LC 44 3049
2-24-3.
(a) The Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation shall include a council, to be known
and designated as the Georgia Rural Development Council, that shall offer guidance to the
Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation.
(b) The Georgia Rural Development Council shall be composed of 12 members who shall
be appointed as follows:
(1) Six members shall be appointed by the Governor which six members, by majority
vote, shall appoint one of such members to serve as the chairperson of the council. Each
of the six shall be selected to represent one of the following areas:
(A) Leadership management;
(B) Business development and entrepreneurship;
(C) Finance and taxes;
(D) Logistics of rural industries;
(E) Healthcare; and
(F) Education;
(2) Three members who live in different geographic areas of this state from each other
shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and
(3) Three members who live in different geographic areas of this state from each other
shall be appointed by the President of the Senate.
(c)(1) Legislative members who are appointed to the council shall serve for two-year
terms. Nonlegislative members shall serve for four-year terms, provided that three of the
initial six members to be appointed by the Governor shall serve initial terms of two years,
and thereafter such appointments shall be for four-year terms.
(2) Members may serve consecutive terms without limit.
(d)(1) The council shall study the conditions, needs, issues, and problems affecting rural
economic development and shall examine related policy areas as it may deem necessary
H. B. 495
- 3 -

LC 44 3049
and appropriate, including, but not limited to, population studies, access to healthcare,
infrastructure, education, unemployment, and economic growth incentives.
(2) All departments and agencies of the state, except the department, shall provide upon
request of the council services, information, and other support for the council and its
work.
(e) The chairperson shall call all meetings of the council. The council shall meet at least
once per quarter and each such meeting shall be at a different location within this state,
particularly in rural areas of this state, for the purpose of interacting with local government
officials, educational leaders, healthcare providers, business leaders, civic groups, and all
other citizens who desire to offer input, so as to enable the council to exercise fully and
effectively its powers, perform its duties, and accomplish the objectives and purposes of
this chapter.
(f)(1) Legislative members of the council shall receive the allowances provided for in
Code Section 28-1-8.
(2) Members of the council who are state officials, other than legislative members, or
state employees shall receive no compensation for their services on the council, but they
may be reimbursed for expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties as
members of the council in the same manner as they are reimbursed for expenses in their
capacities as state officials or employees.
(3) Citizen members of the council shall receive a daily expense allowance in an amount
the same as that specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21, as well as the
mileage or transportation allowance authorized for state employees.
(4) The allowances and expenses authorized by this subsection shall not be received by
the chairperson for more than 15 days and any other member of the council for more than
ten days per year. Funds necessary to carry out the provisions of this Code section shall
come from appropriated funds; provided, however, that funds for the reimbursement of
H. B. 495
- 4 -

LC 44 3049
the expenses of state officials, other than legislative members, and state employees shall
come from funds appropriated to or otherwise available to their respective agencies.
2-24-4.
(a) It shall be the duty of the Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation to provide a
central information and research hub for rural leadership training and best practices which
may include:
(1) Community planning models for proactively identifying value added gaps or
strengths;
(2) Industry-specific assistance; and
(3) Cooperative efforts with nonprofit organizations, religious organizations, and other
100 higher education partners.
101 (b) The Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation may establish such satellite offices as
102 are necessary to accomplish its mission.
103 2-24-5.
104 All funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the establishment and operation of the
105 Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation, together with any funds which may be
106 appropriated by the United States Congress or apportioned to this state from the United
107 States Department of the Treasury for purposes substantially the same as specified in this
108 chapter, shall be paid to the department and then forwarded to the Center for Rural
109 Prosperity and Innovation for its work, provided that the Commissioner formally presents
110 to the Governor the department's acceptance of the conditions of this chapter.
111 2-24-6.
112 In the event that the United States Congress appropriates funds to this state for the conduct
113 of work similar to that which is specified in this chapter, such work of the Center for Rural
H. B. 495
- 5 -

LC 44 3049
114 Prosperity and Innovation shall conform to the requirements imposed as conditions for
115 such federal appropriations and as may be accepted by the General Assembly in order that
116 such scientific, engineering, and industrial research work may be aided and extended by
117 means of such federal appropriations.
118 2-24-7.
119 (a) The Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation shall annually prepare and submit to
120 the General Assembly, for review by the House of Representatives' and the Senate's
121 standing committees on agriculture and economic development, a ten-year strategic plan
122 that outlines the use of the Center for Rural Prosperity and Innovation's resources for the
123 upcoming fiscal years.
124 (b) Said committees may, by majority vote, approve the plan and submit recommendations
125 to the Senate Appropriations Committee and the House Committee on Appropriations for
126 their consideration in developing the budget."
127 SECTION 3.
128 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 495
- 6 -